North Dakota, session 69, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - VOLUNTEER EMERGENCY RESPONDER
RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall
consider studying volunteer emergency responder recruitment and retention. The study must consider
recruitment and retention challenges related to volunteer emergency responders, including firefighters,
emergency or disaster volunteers, and community emergency response team members, and identify
strategies for encouraging volunteerism. The study also must include input from stakeholders, including
disaster emergency organizations, nonprofit associations, representatives of law enforcement,
emergency medical service providers, and state and local agencies, departments, and institutions. The
legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation
required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1311 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1311.
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 3 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State